apertium-pl-cs.pl.dix
    <pardef n="top/ola__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__anatomia_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ól</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olom</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olami</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olach</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   <pardef n="PBASE__filozofia">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__anatomia_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__filozofia">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__filozofia"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__fala">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__filozofia"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__hurtownia">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__hurtownia_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__hurtownia_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hurtowni/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__hurtownia"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fal/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__fala"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    <pardef n="Urszul/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__fala"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="filozofi/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__filozofia"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="choch/la__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__anatomia_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lom</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lami</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lach</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Irlandi/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__filozofia"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Alicj/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__filozofia"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dysertac/ja__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__filozofia"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="stary">
        <p>
          <l>yj</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Słowac/ja__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>ja<s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__filozofia"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="stary">
        <p>
          <l>yj</l>
          <r>ja<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__enter">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__śpioch_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__enter"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__śpioch">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__lekarz_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__śpioch_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="śpioch__n">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__śpioch"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__zenit">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__hit_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__śpioch_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zeni/t__n">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zenit"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ambligonit"><i>ambligoni</i><par n="zeni/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aplanat"><i>aplana</i><par n="zeni/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bankomat"><i>bankoma</i><par n="zeni/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="behawior"><i>behawior</i><par n="enter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="castor"><i>castor</i><par n="enter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cedrat"><i>cedra</i><par n="zeni/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centriola"><i>centriol</i><par n="fal/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dalia"><i>dali</i><par n="filozofi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iglicznia"><i>igliczni</i><par n="hurtowni/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="intranet"><i>intrane</i><par n="zeni/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="introspekcja"><i>introspekc</i><par n="dysertac/ja__n"/></e>
    <e lm="itr"><i>itr</i><par n="enter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barkarola"><i>barkarol</i><par n="fal/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="magnolia"><i>magnoli</i><par n="filozofi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polarymetr"><i>polarymetr</i><par n="enter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="przesadnia"><i>przesadni</i><par n="hurtowni/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stalagmometr"><i>stalagmometr</i><par n="enter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stalaktyt"><i>stalakty</i><par n="zeni/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szufla"><i>szuf</i><par n="choch/la__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tensometr"><i>tensometr</i><par n="enter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tłuścioch"><i>tłuścioch</i><par n="śpioch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wyrocznia"><i>wyroczni</i><par n="hurtowni/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gazownia"><i>gazowni</i><par n="hurtowni/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grobla"><i>grob</i><par n="choch/la__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inżynieria"><i>inżynieri</i><par n="filozofi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leniuch"><i>leniuch</i><par n="śpioch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nowela"><i>nowel</i><par n="fal/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pech"><i>pech</i><par n="śpioch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pralnia"><i>pralni</i><par n="hurtowni/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="składnia"><i>składni</i><par n="hurtowni/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kropla"><i>krop</i><par n="choch/la__n"/></e>
    <e lm="próżnia"><i>próżni</i><par n="hurtowni/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hela"><i>hel</i><par n="fal/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szabla"><i>szab</i><par n="choch/la__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burżuazja"><i>burżuaz</i><par n="dysertac/ja__n"/></e>
    <e lm="likwidacja"><i>likwidac</i><par n="dysertac/ja__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anemia"><i>anemi</i><par n="filozofi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epidemiologia"><i>epidemiologi</i><par n="filozofi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monografia"><i>monografi</i><par n="filozofi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hala"><i>hal</i><par n="fal/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chwila"><i>chwil</i><par n="fal/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="śpioch"><i>śpioch</i><par n="śpioch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vuvuzela"><i>vuvuzel</i><par n="fal/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duch"><i>duch</i><par n="śpioch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strach"><i>strach</i><par n="śpioch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dekolonizacja"><i>dekolonizac</i><par n="dysertac/ja__n"/></e>
    <e lm="legalizacja"><i>legalizac</i><par n="dysertac/ja__n"/></e>
    <e lm="syntetyzacja"><i>syntetyzac</i><par n="dysertac/ja__n"/></e>
    <e lm="topola"><i>top</i><par n="top/ola__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chochla"><i>choch</i><par n="choch/la__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stomatologia"><i>stomatologi</i><par n="filozofi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Julia"><i>Juli</i><par n="Alicj/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Alicja"><i>Alicj</i><par n="Alicj/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Emilia"><i>Emili</i><par n="Alicj/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maria"><i>Mari</i><par n="Alicj/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wigilia"><i>Wigili</i><par n="Alicj/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wiktoria"><i>Wiktori</i><par n="Alicj/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Szkocja"><i>Szkoc</i><par n="Słowac/ja__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Chorwacja"><i>Chorwac</i><par n="Słowac/ja__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hesja"><i>Hes</i><par n="Słowac/ja__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tunezja"><i>Tunez</i><par n="Słowac/ja__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Francja"><i>Franc</i><par n="Słowac/ja__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gruzja"><i>Gruz</i><par n="Słowac/ja__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Erytrea"><i>Erytre</i><par n="Irlandi/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bułgaria"><i>Bułgari</i><par n="Irlandi/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Finlandia"><i>Finlandi</i><par n="Irlandi/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irlandia"><i>Irlandi</i><par n="Irlandi/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Norwegia"><i>Norwegi</i><par n="Irlandi/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Saksonia"><i>Saksoni</i><par n="Irlandi/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dania"><i>Dani</i><par n="Irlandi/a__np"/></e>
